Maryland, session 2025, HB0900.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–637.
(b) A member–regulated cooperative is subject to the following provisions of the
Public Utilities Article:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0900*

HOUSE BILL 900
(1) § 4–212;
(2) § 5–103;
[(2)] (3) § 5–201;
[(3)] (4) § 5–202;
[(4)] (5) § 5–303;
[(5)] (6) § 5–304;
[(6)] (7) § 5–306;
[(7)] (8) § 7–103;
[(8)] (9) § 7–104;
[(9)] (10) § 7–203;
[(10)] (11) § 7–207;
[(11)] (12) Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II;
[(12)] (13) § 7–302;
[(13)] (14) Title 7, Subtitle 5, Part I and Part II;
[(14)] (15) Title 7, Subtitle 7; and
[(15)] (16) § 13–101.
Article – Public Utilities
4–212.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CONTRACT CAPACITY” MEANS THE AMOUNT OF MONTHLY PEAK
LOAD REQUIREMENTS:
(I) THAT IS MUTUALLY AGREED TO BY AN ELECTRIC COMPANY
AND ITS CUSTOMER FOR EACH MONTH REMAINING IN A CONTRACT TERM AFTER THE
LOAD RAMP PERIOD HAS ENDED; AND

HOUSE BILL 900 3
(II) FOR WHICH:
1. THE ELECTRIC COMPANY AGREES TO PROVIDE ALL OF
THE COMPONENTS OF RETAIL ELECTRIC SERVICE SUBJECT TO THE TERMS AND
CONDITIONS IN ITS TARIFFS; AND
2. THE CUSTOMER AGREES TO PURCHASE SERVICE AT
THAT LOAD LEVEL FOR THE STATED TERM OF THE CONTRACT AND UNDER THE SAME
TERMS AND CONDITIONS AS THOSE STATED IN THE CONTRACT.
(3) (I) “DATA CENTER” MEANS A CENTRALIZED FACILITY THAT:
1. IS USED PRIMARILY OR EXCLUSIVELY FOR
ELECTRONIC INFORMATION SERVICES, SUCH AS THE MANAGEMENT, STORAGE,
PROCESSING, AND DISSEMINATION OF ELECTRONIC DATA AND INFORMATION
THROUGH THE USE OF COMPUTER SYSTEMS, SERVERS, NETWORKING EQUIPMENT,
AND RELATED COMPONENTS; AND
2. HAS AN AGGREGATE MONTHLY MAXIMUM DEMAND OF
MORE THAN 2,500 KILOWATTS.
(II) “DATA CENTER” INCLUDES A MOBILE DATA CENTER.
(4) “LOAD RAMP CONTRACT CAPACITY” MEANS THE MONTHLY PEAK
LOAD REQUIREMENTS THAT ARE:
(I) MUTUALLY AGREED TO BY AN ELECTRIC COMPANY AND ITS
CUSTOMER; AND
(II) ASSOCIATED WITH THE LOAD RAMP PERIOD.
(5) “LOAD RAMP PERIOD” MEANS THE PERIOD OF TIME FROM
COMMENCEMENT OF SERVICE UNTIL A CUSTOMER REACHES FULL CONTRACT
CAPACITY.
(6) “MOBILE DATA CENTER” MEANS A CENTRALIZED FACILITY THAT:
(I) IS USED PRIMARILY OR EXCLUSIVELY FOR ELECTRONIC
INFORMATION SERVICES, SUCH AS THE MANAGEMENT, STORAGE, PROCESSING, AND
DISSEMINATION OF ELECTRONIC DATA AND INFORMATION, INCLUDING MINING OF
CRYPTOCURRENCY, THROUGH THE USE OF COMPUTER SYSTEMS, SERVERS,
NETWORKING EQUIPMENT, AND RELATED COMPONENTS;

HOUSE BILL 900
(II) HAS AN AGGREGATE MONTHLY MAXIMUM DEMAND OF MORE
THAN 2,500 KILOWATTS; AND
(III) HAS AT LEAST ONE DEVICE THAT IS:
1. CONNECTED TO THE CUSTOMER’S METER; AND
2. PORTABLE OR DISTRIBUTABLE, INCLUDING
STRUCTURES THAT ARE NOT AFFIXED TO THE GROUND OR ARE EASILY REMOVED
FROM A LOCATION.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL
SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION FOR APPROVAL A SPECIFIC RATE SCHEDULE FOR
DATA CENTER CUSTOMERS AND MOBILE DATA CENTER CUSTOMERS.
(2) (I) SERVICE UNDER A SPECIFIC RATE SCHEDULE SHALL BE
AVAILABLE TO CUSTOMERS THAT OPERATE A DATA CENTER THAT WILL USE, WITHIN
THE INITIAL CONTRACT TERM:
1. A MONTHLY MAXIMUM DEMAND OF MORE THAN 2,500
KILOWATTS AT A SINGLE LOCATION; OR
2. AN AGGREGATED CONTRACT CAPACITY IN THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S SERVICE TERRITORY OF MORE THAN 2,500 KILOWATTS.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, CUSTOMERS THAT QUALIFY FOR A SPECIFIC RATE SCHEDULE AFTER
THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THAT SCHEDULE:
1. SHALL TAKE SERVICE UNDER THE SPECIFIC RATE
SCHEDULE; AND
2. MAY NOT BE ALLOWED TO TAKE SERVICE UNDER ANY
OTHER EXISTING SCHEDULE.
(III) A SPECIFIC RATE SCHEDULE DOES NOT APPLY TO AN
EXISTING DATA CENTER CUSTOMER THAT HAS SIGNED A SERVICE AGREEMENT
BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE SCHEDULE IF:
1. THE DATA CENTER’S EXISTING LOAD DOES NOT
EXPAND BY MORE THAN 2,500 KILOWATTS UNDER THE EXISTING SERVICE
AGREEMENT; OR

HOUSE BILL 900 5
2. THE DATA CENTER DOES NOT SIGN A NEW SERVICE
AGREEMENT TO EXPAND THE DATA CENTER’S LOAD BY MORE THAN 2,500
KILOWATTS ABOVE THE CONTRACT CAPACITY OF THE EXISTING SERVICE
AGREEMENT.
(C) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE A SPECIFIC RATE SCHEDULE
SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION UNLESS:
(1) THE LOAD RAMP PERIOD USED IN CONTRACTS FOR SERVICE
UNDER THE SCHEDULE DOES NOT EXCEED 4 YEARS;
(2) THE CONTRACTS FOR SERVICE UNDER THE SCHEDULE ARE FOR
AN INITIAL PERIOD OF NOT LESS THAN THE LOAD RAMP PERIOD PLUS 20 YEARS;
(3) THE LOAD RAMP CONTRACT CAPACITY IN CONTRACTS FOR
SERVICE UNDER THE SCHEDULE IS NOT LESS THAN:
(I) IN YEAR 1, 50% OF CONTRACT CAPACITY;
(II) IN YEAR 2, 65% OF CONTRACT CAPACITY;
(III) IN YEAR 3, 80% OF CONTRACT CAPACITY; AND
(IV) IN YEAR 4, 90% OF CONTRACT CAPACITY;
(4) (I) DURING THE INITIAL TERM OF THE CONTRACT FOR SERVICE
UNDER THE SCHEDULE, THE CUSTOMER WILL BE FINANCIALLY RESPONSIBLE TO
PAY THE MINIMUM SERVICE CHARGES ASSOCIATED WITH THE CONTRACT EVEN IF
THE CUSTOMER CHOOSES TO CURTAIL, REDUCE, SUSPEND, OR TERMINATE SERVICE;
OR
(II) THE CUSTOMER IS REQUIRED TO PAY AN EXIT FEE EQUAL TO
THE MINIMUM CHARGES FOR 120 MONTHS OF SERVICE IF THE CUSTOMER DECIDES
TO TERMINATE THE CONTRACT FOR SERVICE UNDER THE SCHEDULE AFTER
COMPLETION OF THE 10TH YEAR OF THE CONTRACT AFTER THE LOAD RAMP
PERIOD;
(5) (I) THE MINIMUM MONTHLY DISTRIBUTION BILLING DEMAND
FOR CONTRACTS FOR SERVICE UNDER THE SCHEDULE IS NOT LESS THAN 90% OF
THE CUSTOMER’S LOAD RAMP CONTRACT CAPACITY; AND

HOUSE BILL 900
(II) AFTER THE LOAD RAMP PERIOD, THE MONTHLY
DISTRIBUTION BILLING DEMAND FOR CONTRACTS FOR SERVICE UNDER THE
SCHEDULE IS NOT LESS THAN 90% OF THE CUSTOMER’S CONTRACT CAPACITY;
(6) THE MINIMUM MONTHLY TRANSMISSION BILLING DEMAND FOR
CONTRACTS FOR SERVICE UNDER THE SCHEDULE IS NOT LESS THAN 90% OF THE
CUSTOMER’S CONTRACT CAPACITY; AND
(7) BEFORE SIGNING A CONTRACT FOR SERVICE UNDER THE
SCHEDULE, A CUSTOMER UNDER THE SCHEDULE IS REQUIRED TO:
(I) SUBMIT A REQUEST FOR A LOAD STUDY TO DETERMINE THE
NECESSARY CONTRACT CAPACITY FOR THE CUSTOMER AND PAY ANY APPLICABLE
FEES ASSOCIATED WITH THE STUDY;
(II) DESIGNATE A SPECIFIC SITE WHERE THE CUSTOMER’S DATA
CENTER PROJECT WILL BE CONSTRUCTED AND SERVED BY THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY;
(III) OWN OR HAVE THE EXCLUSIVE RIGHT TO USE THE LAND
DESIGNATED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS ITEM FOR THE DATA CENTER PROJECT;
(IV) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION,
PROVIDE A GUARANTEE OR COLLATERAL AT THE TIME OF SIGNING THE CONTRACT
THAT IS EQUAL TO 50% OF THE TOTAL MINIMUM CHARGES FOR THE FULL TERM OF
THE CONTRACT CALCULATED BASED ON THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S RATES IN
EFFECT AT THE TIME THE GUARANTEE OR COLLATERAL IS PROVIDED; AND
(V) AGREE TO REIMBURSE THE ELECTRIC COMPANY FOR 100%
OF ITS BUILDOUT COSTS TO SERVE THE CUSTOMER IF THE CUSTOMER CANCELS OR
DELAYS THE DATA CENTER PROJECT BY MORE THAN 12 MONTHS BEFORE THE
TARGET DATE ON WHICH THE ELECTRIC COMPANY PLANS TO BEGIN PROVIDING
ELECTRICITY TO THE CUSTOMER.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY WAIVE THE GUARANTEE AND COLLATERAL
REQUIREMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(7)(IV) OF THIS SECTION FOR A CUSTOMER
THAT HAS:
(1) A CREDIT RATING OF AT LEAST A– FROM S&P GLOBAL INC. AND
A3 FROM MOODY’S CORPORATION; AND
(2) CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS ON AN AUDITED BALANCE SHEET
PREPARED IN ACCORDANCE WITH GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING

HOUSE BILL 900 7
PRINCIPLES GREATER THAN 10 TIMES THE GUARANTEE AND COLLATERAL
REQUIREMENT.
(E) (1) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE COMMISSION SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REGULATIONS SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH MINIMUM NOTICE REQUIREMENTS AND
DEADLINES RELATED TO LOAD STUDY REQUESTS AND CONTRACT TERMINATIONS
AND ADJUSTMENTS;
(II) SPECIFY COMMON FORMS OF ACCEPTABLE COLLATERAL TO
SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) ESTABLISH DEADLINES RELATED TO COMPLETION OF LOAD
STUDIES AND PAYMENT OF FEES.
(F) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PRECLUDE AN ELECTRIC COMPANY FROM
PLACING ANY OTHER TERMS OR CONDITIONS OF SERVICE ON A CUSTOMER BEYOND
THE CONDITIONS REQUIRED FOR A CONTRACT UNDER A SPECIFIC RATE SCHEDULE
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.